Georgia, session 2025_26, HB700.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 10-1-393.3 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to prohibited
use of purchaser's credit card information by merchant, is amended by adding a new
subsection to read as follows:
"(d.1) A merchant shall be prohibited from requiring a purchaser using a credit card for
any transaction to pay a surcharge in an amount that exceeds the actual cost to the merchant
to process the transaction."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 700
- 1 -